South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Extension of alcohol server training deadline SECTION 1.    The deadline to receive alcohol server training as provided for in Chapter 3, Title 61 is extended to May 1, 2026. Time effective SECTION 2.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 5th day of March, 2026. Approved the 9th day of March, 2026. -- T. ----XX----